Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-255
Commission decision;
appeal.

Any decision of the commission made pursuant
to the Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices Act or the rules and regulations
may be appealed. The appeal shall be in accordance with section 75-136.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2000, § 86-1219;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 117;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 13.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.